Massachusetts, session 194th, S1371.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be established a Workforce Recovery Commission, the purpose
shall be to facilitate the development, retention, and support of a workforce in the
commonwealth necessary to continued economic prosperity, inclusion, diversity, and equity in
the context of evolving changes attributable to the COVID-19 pandemic and other factors
including but not limited to changes in demographics, technology, housing and transportation,
and skill and education levels required by employers and those available in the workforce.
SECTION 2. The commission shall be chaired by the secretary of labor and workforce
development, and consist of 18 additional members appointed by the governor, including two
members representing employers in the commonwealth with less than ten employees, two
members representing employers with between 10 and 100 employees, two members
of 2

representing employers with more than 100 employees, 2 members representing institutions of
higher learning in the commonwealth, 1 of whom shall represent community colleges, 3
members representing organized labor, 3 members with professional experience in human
resources, staffing, and recruiting, 3 members representing regional workforce investment boards
from geographically diverse regions of the commonwealth, 1 member whom shall be an
economist, and 1 member whom shall represent vocational schools in the commonwealth.
SECTION 3. The commission shall meet not less than three times per year, provided that
its first meeting shall occur not more than ninety days following the passage of this act.
of 2